Indiana, session 2026, HB1049.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-8-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) As used in this section, "doula" means an
individual who is trained and certified by a nationally recognized
institution in providing emotional and physical support, but not
medical or midwife care, to pregnant women before, during, and
after childbirth.
(b) As used in this section, "state employee health plan" means
the following:
(1) A self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of
this chapter.
(2) A contract for prepaid health services entered into under
section 7(c) of this chapter.
(c) A state employee health plan must provide coverage for
doula services.
(d) The coverage required by this section may not be subject to
annual or lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or
2026 IN 1049—LS 6035/DI 141


coinsurance provisions that are more restrictive than the annual or
lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
provisions that apply generally under the state employee health
plan.
SECTION 2. IC 12-15-5-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.35-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Pregnancy services provided under this
article may shall include reimbursement for doula services.
(b) The office may shall apply for any state plan amendment or
waiver necessary to implement this section.
(c) The office may shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
SECTION 3. IC 27-8-40 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 40. Coverage for Doula Services
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "doula" means an individual who
is trained and certified by a nationally recognized institution in
providing emotional and physical support, but not medical or
midwife care, to pregnant women before, during, and after
childbirth.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "policy of accident and sickness
insurance" has the meaning set forth in IC 27-8-5-1. The term does
not include a policy, plan, or coverage set forth in IC 27-8-5-2.5(a).
Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to a policy of accident and
sickness insurance that is delivered, issued, or renewed after June
30, 2026.
(b) A policy of accident and sickness insurance must provide
coverage for doula services.
Sec. 4. The coverage required by this chapter may not be subject
to annual or lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance provisions that are more restrictive than the annual or
lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
provisions that apply generally under the policy of accident and
sickness insurance.
SECTION 4. IC 27-13-7-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) This section applies to an individual contract
or a group contract that is entered into, amended, or renewed after
June 30, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "doula" means an individual who is
trained and certified by a nationally recognized institution in
2026 IN 1049—LS 6035/DI 141


providing emotional and physical support, but not medical or
midwife care, to pregnant women before, during, and after
childbirth.
(c) An individual contract and a group contract must provide
coverage for doula services.
(d) The coverage required by this section may not be subject to
annual or lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance provisions that are more restrictive than the annual or
lifetime limitation, deductible, copayment, or coinsurance
provisions that apply generally under the individual contract or
group contract.
2026 IN 1049—LS 6035/DI 141